Utah statutes.
53A-1-905.   Notice of voidableness of federal education agreements.
A federal education agreement that may cost education entities more than
$500,000 annually from state and local money to implement, that is executed by
a school official in violation of this part, is voidable by the governor or
the Legislature as provided in this part.
